Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF65.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1564XS (3) 91 as/js S.F. 65 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 80B.17A Background investigation 1 prior to certification or recertification. 2 1. For purposes of this section, âmoral turpitudeâ is 3 defined as an act of baseness, vileness, or depravity in the 4 private and social duties that a person owes to another person 5 or to society in general, and includes conduct that is contrary 6 to justice, honesty, or good morals. 7 2. All law enforcement officers shall be certified through 8 the successful completion of training at an approved law 9 enforcement training facility. Prior to enrollment in a 10 certifying training program, all law enforcement officers shall 11 be of good moral character as determined through a thorough 12 background investigation and shall not have been convicted 13 of any felony or a crime or adjudication involving moral 14 turpitude, including but not limited to any of the following: 15 a. A misdemeanor crime of domestic violence as defined in 16 section 724.26, subsection 2, paragraph âcâ , or other offenses 17 of domestic violence. 18 b. An adjudication of delinquency based on conduct that 19 would constitute a felony if committed by an adult. 20 c. Any sex crime or crime listed in chapter 709. 21 d. Any crime committed as an adult that resulted in being 22 listed on the sex offender registry. 23 e. An adjudication of delinquency based on conduct that 24 would constitute a crime if committed by an adult that resulted 25 in being listed on the sex offender registry. 26 f. Any crime involving child abuse as defined in section 27 232.68, subsection 2, resulting in placement in the central 28 registry as a case of founded child abuse under section 29 232.71D. 30 3. All law enforcement officers seeking recertification 31 shall be subject to a background investigation as provided in 32 subsection 2. 33